District of Columbia statutes.
7-2509.02

Application requirements.

(a)

A person who submits an application pursuant to § 22-4506 shall certify and demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Chief that he or she:

(1)

Is at least 21 years of age;

(2)

Meets all of the requirements for a person registering a firearm pursuant to this unit, and has obtained a registration certificate for the pistol that the person is applying to carry concealed;

(3)

(A)

Does not currently suffer from a mental illness or condition that creates a substantial risk that he or she is a danger to himself or herself or others; or

(B)

If he or she has suffered in the previous 5 years from a mental illness or condition that created a substantial risk that he or she was a danger to himself or herself or others, no longer suffers from a mental illness or condition that creates a substantial risk that he or she is a danger to himself or herself or others;

(4)

Has completed a firearms training course or combination of courses, conducted by an instructor (or instructors) certified by the Chief, which includes at least 16 hours of training, and covers the following:

(A)

Firearm safety;

(B)

Firearm nomenclature;

(C)

Basic principles of marksmanship;

(D)

Care, cleaning, maintenance, loading, unloading, and storage of pistols;

(E)

Situational awareness, conflict management, and use of deadly force;

(F)

Selection of pistols and ammunition for defensive purposes; and

(G)

All applicable District and federal firearms laws, including the requirements of this unit, Chapter 45 of Title 22 [§ 22-4501 et seq.], and District law pertaining to self-defense;

(5)

Has completed at least 2 hours of range training, conducted by an instructor certified by the Chief, including shooting a qualification course of 50 rounds of ammunition from a maximum distance of 15 yards (45 feet); and

(6)

Has complied with any procedures the Chief may establish by rule.

(b)

An applicant shall satisfy the requirements of subsection (a)(4) and (a)(5) of this section with a certification from a firearms instructor that the applicant:

(1)

Demonstrated satisfactory completion of the requirements of subsection (a)(4) and (a)(5) of this section; and

(2)

Possesses the proper knowledge, skills, and attitude to carry a concealed pistol.

(c)

An applicant may be exempt from some or all of the requirements of subsection (a)(4) and (a)(5) of this section if the applicant has submitted evidence that he or she has received firearms training in the United States military or has otherwise completed firearms training conducted by a firearms instructor that, as determined by the Chief, is equal to or greater than that required under subsection (a)(4) and (a)(5) of this section.

(d)

An applicant for a license may satisfy any component of the requirements of subsection (a)(4) and (a)(5) of this section by demonstrating to the satisfaction of the Chief that the applicant has met that particular component as part of a successful application to carry a concealed pistol issued by the lawful authorities of any state or subdivision of the United States.

(e)

(1)

An applicant shall sign an oath or affirmation attesting to the truth of all the information required by § 22-4506 and this section.

(2)

Any declaration, certificate, verification, or statement made for purposes of an application for a license to carry a concealed pistol pursuant to this unit shall be made under penalty of perjury pursuant to § 22-2402.

(f)

An applicant is required to appear for an in-person interview at the MPD headquarters for purposes including verification of the applicant’s identity and verification of the information submitted as part of the application process for a license.

(g)

Any person whose application has been denied may, within 15 days after the date of the notice of denial, appeal to the Concealed Pistol Licensing Review Board established pursuant to §  7-2509.08.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, § 902
as added June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-279, § 2(f), 62 DCR 1944